Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 93-14-501.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 384, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 93-14-502.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 USCS, Section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 USCS Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 USCS Section 7003(b).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 384, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 93-14-503.
[Reserved].

[Reserved for future codification purposes.]

§ 93-14-504.
Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to guardianship and protective proceedings begun on or after July 1, 2014.

Articles 1, 3 and 4 and Sections 93-14-501 and 93-14-502 apply to proceedings begun before July 1, 2014, regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 384, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.